Wisconsin, session 2025, SB762.
do enact as follows:SB762,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB762,28Section 2. 20.370 (6) (cs) of the statutes is created to read:SB762,2,11920.370 (6) (cs) Environmental aids - private well testing grant program. From 10the environmental fund, the amounts in the schedule to provide grants for testing 11privately owned wells under s. 281.73.SB762,312Section 3. 281.73 of the statutes is created to read:SB762,2,1513281.73 Private well testing grant program. (1) The department shall 14administer a program to provide the following grants from the appropriation under 15s. 20.370 (6) (cs):SB762,3,316(a) Grants to any county and to any city, village, or town that contains 17privately owned wells or water supplies for the purpose of testing and mapping 18privately owned wells to assess groundwater quality and to determine the extent 19and type of any contamination and to study and map geologic characteristics and 1well construction practices, including depth to bedrock and well age, to determine 2any correlation between water quality, geology, and well construction. A grant 3provided under this paragraph may not exceed $10,000.SB762,3,74(b) Grants to county health departments and county land and water 5conservation departments for the purpose of providing education and outreach 6related to well testing. A grant provided under this paragraph may not exceed 7$10,000.SB762,3,108(2) Eligible applicants may apply for the grants under sub. (1) individually or 9jointly with any other eligible applicant and may apply for the grants under sub. (1) 10(a) and (b) simultaneously.SB762,3,1511(3) The recipient of a grant under sub. (1) (a) shall submit the results of its 12testing and study to the department and the University of Wisconsin–Stevens Point 13Center for Watershed Science and Education but may not include any personally 14identifiable information, including specific property locations, with the submitted 15results.SB762,3,1616(4) The department may promulgate rules to implement this section.SB762,417Section 4. 281.74 of the statutes is created to read:SB762,3,2018281.74 Well testing importance. A city, village, or town that contains 19privately owned wells or water supplies shall inform its residents of the importance 20of regular well testing.SB762,521Section 5. Nonstatutory provisions.SB762,4,822(1) Emergency rules. The department of natural resources may use the 23procedure under s. 227.24 to promulgate emergency rules relating to the private 1well testing grant program under s. 281.73 for the period before the effective date of 2any permanent rules promulgated under s. 281.73 but not to exceed the period 3authorized under s. 227.24 (1) (c), subject to extension under s. 227.24 (2). 4Notwithstanding s. 227.24 (1) (a), (2) (b), and (3), when promulgating emergency 5rules under this subsection, the department is not required to provide evidence that 6promulgating a rule under this subsection as an emergency rule is necessary for the 7preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or welfare and is not required to 8provide a finding of emergency for a rule promulgated under this subsection.SB762,4,99